Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-3433
Roster.

The board shall maintain and make available to the public a complete roster of all architects and professional engineers showing their names and last-known addresses. The board shall file the roster with the Secretary of State and may distribute a copy to each licensed person as well as county and municipal officials. The board may charge a fee for distributing the roster.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 33;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 30.